Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-430
Participation; age limitation.

(1) No person under eighteen years of age shall participate in any way in any lottery or raffle, except that a person under eighteen years of age may participate in a lottery or raffle conducted by a licensed organization pursuant to a permit issued under section 9-426.

(2) No person, licensee, or permittee or employee or agent thereof shall knowingly permit an individual under eighteen years of age to play or participate in any way in a lottery or raffle conducted pursuant to the Nebraska Lottery and Raffle Act, excluding those conducted by a licensed organization with a special permit issued under section 9-426.

Laws 1986, LB 1027, § 151;

Laws 1997, LB 248, § 26.